Indiana, session 2026, HB1041.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-26.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 26.6. Line Maintenance in Public Rights-of-Way; Line
Pollution Violations
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to:
(1) an initial installation of facilities in a public right-of way;
and
(2) the ongoing maintenance of facilities located in a public
right-of-way.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "facility" means any:
(1) line;
(2) cable;
(3) conduit;
(4) housing;
(5) structure; or
(6) other equipment;
2026 IN 1041—LS 6238/DI 101


used in furnishing communications service (as defined in
IC 8-1-32.5-3) or utility service to the public.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "line pollution violation" means
a violation involving:
(1) noncompliance with any standard or requirement set forth
in section 6 or 7 of this chapter with respect to the installation
and maintenance of a facility in a public right-of-way; or
(2) the presence of any damaged, abandoned, loose, or
improperly secured facilities within a public right-of-way;
attributable to a permittee.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "permittee" refers to:
(1) a person to whom an initial permit or other authorization
for the installation of a facility in a public right-of-way is
granted by a unit; or
(2) a service provider responsible for maintaining a facility
that has been installed in a public right-of-way;
as the context requires.
(b) The term includes an agent, including a contractor or
subcontractor, of a person described in subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2).
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "unit" means a:
(1) county; or
(2) municipality (as defined in IC 36-1-2-11);
authorized by IC 8-1-2-101 to regulate the occupation and use of
a public right-of-way.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding IC 8-1-2-101(a), the following minimum
standards apply to the installation and maintenance of a facility in
a public right-of-way:
(1) The installation, placement, and storage of cables and
conduit in a public right-of-way must comply with all
applicable federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and
guidelines.
(2) Aerial cables must be properly secured overhead and may
not hang loose or be placed at ground level. Cables that are
abandoned or inactive must be removed and properly
disposed of.
(3) Cables transitioning from an overhead placement to an
underground placement must be secured in proper pole riser
guards, with no loose cables hanging overhead.
(4) Conduit rising out of the ground at a pole must be fastened
to the bottom of the pole and may not be allowed to dangle or
sway.
(5) Conduit that:
2026 IN 1041—LS 6238/DI 101


(A) rises out of the ground; and
(B) is not secured:
(i) to a pole; or
(ii) in a structure;
may not lie loose on the ground. Upon discovering or
receiving notice of the presence of unsecured conduit in the
right-of-way, the permittee shall place proper barriers around
the conduit to prevent potential hazards until the conduit can
be placed in proper facilities. Not later than fourteen (14) days
after receiving notice of the presence of unsecured conduit in
the right-of-way, the permittee shall cause the conduit to be
placed in proper facilities.
(6) Structures buried in hand holes and vaults must be
installed at grade and must be in working condition. Upon
discovering or receiving notice of any damaged structure, the
permittee shall secure the structure and place proper barriers
around the structure to prevent harm to the public until the
structure can be repaired or replaced. Not later than fourteen
(14) days after receiving notice of a damaged structure, the
permittee shall cause the structure to be repaired or replaced.
(7) Vertical structures, including:
(A) pedestals;
(B) cable housing units; and
(C) cabinets;
that are damaged or inoperable must be replaced or removed.
Upon discovering or receiving notice of a damaged or
inoperable vertical structure, the permittee shall secure the
vertical structure and place proper barriers around the
structure to prevent harm to the public until the vertical
structure can be replaced or removed. Not later than fourteen
(14) days after receiving notice of a damaged or inoperable
vertical structure, the permittee shall cause the damaged or
inoperable structure to be replaced or removed.
(8) To the extent practicable, each facility, or grouping of
related facilities, installed in a public right-of-way by or on
behalf of a permittee must include the name of, and contact
information for:
(A) the permittee; and
(B) in the case of a permittee described in section 4(a)(1) of
this chapter, any permittee described in section 4(a)(2) of
this chapter that acts on behalf of the permittee described
in section 4(a)(1) of this chapter to maintain the facility, or
2026 IN 1041—LS 6238/DI 101


grouping of facilities, installed in the public right-of-way.
Sec. 7. (a) This section applies to equipment that:
(1) is used by an agent of a permittee to install, place, store,
maintain, repair, or replace one (1) or more facilities in a
public right-of-way; and
(2) remains in the public right-of-way on a temporary or
permanent basis during or after the installation, placement,
storage, maintenance, repair, or replacement of one (1) or
more facilities in the public right-of-way.
(b) As used in this section, "agent", with respect to a permittee,
includes the following:
(1) A contractor or subcontractor of the permittee, in the case
of a permittee described in section 4(a)(1) or 4(a)(2) of this
chapter.
(2) In the case of a permittee described in section 4(a)(1) of
this chapter, a permittee described in section 4(a)(2) of this
chapter that acts on behalf of the permittee described in
section 4(a)(1) of this chapter to maintain a facility installed
in a public right-of-way.
(c) Equipment described in subsection (a) must be clearly
marked with the name of, and contact information for:
(1) the agent owning or using the equipment for a purpose
described in subsection (a); and
(2) the permittee on whose behalf the agent is acting in
connection with a purpose described in subsection (a).
Sec. 8. A permittee responsible for a line pollution violation is
liable to the unit owning the public right-of-way for a fine in an
amount determined by the unit, but not to exceed five hundred
dollars ($500) per violation for each day the line pollution violation
remains uncured after any date of compliance required by the unit.
The total amount of a fine imposed by a unit under this section for
an uncured violation may not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500).
Sec. 9. (a) This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict
the authority of a unit to:
(1) impose more stringent standards for the installation and
maintenance of a facility in a public right-of-way than the
standards set forth in section 6 of this chapter; or
(2) otherwise regulate the occupation and use of a public
right-of-way under IC 8-1-2-101.
(b) This chapter does not abrogate or limit a permittee's duty to
comply with any relevant provisions of IC 8-1-26 with respect to
2026 IN 1041—LS 6238/DI 101


underground facilities owned or operated by the permittee. A
permittee shall ensure that any agent, contractor, subcontractor,
excavator, or other person responsible for installing, replacing,
relocating, or repairing any underground facility that is owned or
operated by the permittee and located within a public right-of-way
complies with the requirements set forth in:
(1) IC 8-1-26-20; and
(2) any applicable local ordinance or regulation;
with respect to any work involving drilling, trenching, boring, hand
digging, or plowing.
2026 IN 1041—LS 6238/DI 101